Utah, session 2026, HB559.
Section 1. Section 26B-2-244 is enacted to read:26B-2-244. Bereavement practices in health care facilities that provide birthing services.(1)The division, in collaboration with the Office of Maternal and Child Health, shall establish rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding required practices when an individual experiences a pregnancy or infant loss at a health care facility that provides birthing services, to ensure that the individual experiencing the loss is treated with dignity and compassion.(2)Required practices described in Subsection (1) may include:(a)opportunities for a parent to have memory-making experiences, such as photos, hand and foot molds, keepsakes, or written materials, when it is practicable based on the age of the infant or other factors;(b)access to grief counseling;(c)procedures when a loss is anticipated before birth;(d)referrals to or collaboration with organizations that provide support or resources for parents experiencing a loss;(e)access to a perinatal cooling device; or(f)permitting a parent sufficient time and space with the parent's infant.(3)The division shall require compliance with the policies and rules developed in accordance with this section as a condition of initial licensure or licensure renewal for a facility that provides birthing services.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 58-1-605 is enacted to read:58-1-605. Required bereavement training.(1)(a)The division, in collaboration with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall develop an optional training to educate health care providers on best practices for supporting patients and families experiencing pregnancy or infant loss.(b)The training shall be for providers, but may incorporate rules and procedures relating to pregnancy and infant loss for health care facilities described in Section 26B-2-244.(2)The division shall establish rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that allow licensed health care professionals that work in emergency care, obstetrics and gynecology, and labor and delivery settings to take the bereavement training and have the training apply to the health care professional's continuing medical education credit requirements.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63G-1-401 is amended to read:63G-1-401. Commemorative periods.(1)As used in this section, "commemorative period" means a special observance declared by the governor that annually recognizes and honors a culturally or historically significant day, week, month, or other time period in the state.(2)(a)The governor may declare a commemorative period by issuing a declaration.(b)The governor shall maintain a list of all commemorative periods declared by the governor.(3)(a)The governor's declaration of a commemorative period expires the year immediately following the day on which the governor issues the declaration.(b)Subsection (3)(a) does not prevent the governor from redeclaring a commemorative period before or after the commemorative period expires.(4)Notwithstanding Subsections (2) and (3), the following days shall be commemorated annually:(a)Utah History Day at the Capitol, on the Friday immediately following the fourth Monday in January, to encourage citizens of the state, including students, to participate in activities that recognize Utah's history;(b)Day of Remembrance for Incarceration of Japanese Americans, on February 19, in remembrance of the incarceration of Japanese Americans during World War II;(c)Utah State Flag Day, on March 9;(d)Vietnam Veterans Recognition Day, on March 29;(e)Utah Railroad Workers Day, on May 10;(f)Dandy-Walker Syndrome Awareness Day, on May 11;(g)Armed Forces Day, on the third Saturday in May, in honor of men and women who are serving or have served in the United States Armed Forces around the world in defense of freedom;(h)Arthrogryposis Multiplex Congenita Awareness Day, on June 30;(i)Navajo Code Talker Day, on August 14;(j)Rachael Runyan/Missing and Exploited Children's Day, on August 26, the anniversary of the day three-year-old Rachael Runyan was kidnaped from a playground in Sunset, Utah, to:(i)encourage individuals to make child safety a priority;(ii)remember the importance of continued efforts to reunite missing children with their families; and(iii)honor Rachael Runyan and all Utah children who have been abducted or exploited;(k)September 11th Day of Remembrance, on September 11, in honor and remembrance of the first responders and persons killed and injured in the terrorist attacks on September 11, 2001;(l)Constitution Day, on September 17, to invite all Utah adults and Utah school children to read directly from the United States Constitution and other primary sources, and for students to be taught principles from the United States Constitution that include federalism, checks and balances, separation of powers, popular sovereignty, limited government, and the necessary and proper, commerce, and supremacy clauses;(m)POW/MIA Recognition Day, on the third Friday in September;(n)Victims of Communism Memorial Day, on November 7;(o)Indigenous People Day, on the Monday immediately preceding Thanksgiving; and(p)Bill of Rights Day, on December 15.(5)The Department of Veterans and Military Affairs shall coordinate activities, special programs, and promotional information to heighten public awareness and involvement relating to Subsections (4)(g) and (m).(6)The month of April shall be commemorated annually as Clean Out the Medicine Cabinet Month to:(a)recognize the urgent need to make Utah homes and neighborhoods safe from prescription medication abuse and poisonings by the proper home storage and disposal of prescription and over-the-counter medications; and(b)educate citizens about the permanent medication disposal sites in Utah listed on useonlyasdirected.org that allow disposal throughout the year.(7)The second full week of April shall be commemorated annually as Animal Care and Control Appreciation Week to recognize and increase awareness within the community of the services that animal care and control professionals provide.(8)The first full week of May shall be commemorated annually as State Water Week to recognize the importance of water conservation, quality, and supply in the state.(9)The third full week of June shall be commemorated annually as Workplace Safety Week to heighten public awareness regarding the importance of safety in the workplace.(10)The second Friday and Saturday in August shall be commemorated annually as Utah Fallen Heroes Days to:(a)honor fallen heroes who, during service in the military or public safety, have sacrificed their lives to protect the country and the citizens of the state; and(b)encourage political subdivisions to acknowledge and honor fallen heroes.(11)The third full week in August shall be commemorated annually as Drowsy Driving Awareness Week to:(a)educate the public about the relationship between fatigue and driving performance; and(b)encourage the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Transportation to recognize and promote educational efforts on the dangers of drowsy driving.(12)The month of September shall be commemorated annually as American Founders and Constitution Month to:(a)encourage all civic, fraternal, and religious organizations, and public and private educational institutions, to recognize and observe this occasion through appropriate programs, teaching, meetings, services, or celebrations in which state, county, and local governmental officials are invited to participate; and(b)invite all Utah school children to read directly from the United States Constitution and other primary sources, and to be taught principles from the United States Constitution that include federalism, checks and balances, separation of powers, popular sovereignty, limited government, and the necessary and proper, commerce, and supremacy clauses.(13)The third full week of September shall be commemorated annually as Gang Prevention Awareness Week.(14)The month of October shall be commemorated annually as Italian-American Heritage Month.(15)The month of November shall be commemorated annually as American Indian Heritage Month.(16)The first full week of December shall be commemorated annually as Avalanche Awareness Week to:(a)educate the public about avalanche awareness and safety;(b)encourage collaborative efforts to decrease annual avalanche accidents and fatalities; and(c)honor Utah residents who have lost their lives in avalanches, including those who lost their lives working to prevent avalanches.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.